Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Chapter 117. Vermont Crime Information Center
§ 2064.
Subscription service.

As used in this section:

“State Identification Number (SID)” means a unique number generated by the Center to identify a person in the criminal history database.

“Subscription service” means a service provided by the Center through which authorized requestors may be notified when an individual’s criminal record is updated.

The Center shall provide the Department for Children and Families and education officials authorized under 16 V.S.A. chapter 5, subchapter 4 to receive criminal records access to a criminal record subscription service. Authorized persons may subscribe to an individual’s SID number, provided the individual has given written authorization on a release form provided by the Center.

The release form shall contain the individual’s name, signature, date of birth, and place of birth. The release form shall state that the individual has the right to appeal the findings to the Center, pursuant to rules adopted by the Commissioner of Public Safety.

The Center shall provide authorized officials with information regarding the subscription service offered by the Center prior to being authorized to participate in the subscription service. The materials shall address the following topics:

Requirements of subscription, renewal, and cancellation with the service.

How to interpret the criminal conviction records.

How to obtain source documents summarized in the criminal conviction records.

Misuse of the subscription service.

Authorized officials shall certify on their subscription request that they have read and understood materials prior to receiving authorization to request a subscription from the Center.

During the subscription period, the Center shall notify authorized officials in writing if new criminal conviction information is added to an individual’s criminal history record. Notification may be sent electronically.

An authorized official who receives a criminal conviction record pursuant to this section shall provide a free copy of such record to the subject of the record within ten days of receipt of the record.

Except insofar as criminal conviction record information must be retained or made public pursuant to 16 V.S.A. chapter 51 or the State Board of Education administrative rules adopted pursuant to that chapter, no person shall confirm the existence or nonexistence of criminal conviction record information or disclose the contents of a criminal conviction record without the individual’s permission to any person other than the individual and properly designated employees of the authorized education official who have a documented need to know the contents of the record.

Except insofar as criminal conviction record information must be retained or made public pursuant to 16 V.S.A. chapter 51 or the State Board of Education administrative rules adopted pursuant to that chapter, authorized education officials shall confidentially retain all criminal conviction information received pursuant to this section for a period of three years. At the end of the retention period, the criminal conviction information must be shredded.

A person who violates any subsection of this section shall be assessed a civil penalty of not more than $5,000.00. Each unauthorized disclosure shall constitute a separate civil violation. The Attorney General shall have authority to enforce this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 1

, § 8, eff. July 1, 2010; amended

2021, No. 20

, § 162.

§ 2065.
Ratification of the National Crime Prevention and Privacy Compact.

The Vermont General Assembly hereby approves and ratifies the National Crime Prevention and Privacy Compact, 34 U.S.C. §§ 40311- 40316. The Compact shall remain in effect until legislation is enacted renouncing or rescinding the Compact.

The Commissioner of the Department of Public Safety shall execute, administer, and implement the Compact on behalf of the State, and may adopt rules as necessary for the national exchange of criminal history records for noncriminal justice purposes.

Criminal history records as defined in subdivision 2056a(a)(1) of this title shall be made available to lawfully entitled requestors in other states according to the provisions of the National Crime Prevention and Privacy Compact.

Nothing in this section shall alter the duties and responsibilities of the Commissioner of the Department of Public Safety regarding the dissemination of criminal history records within the State of Vermont pursuant to statute.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 108

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.